Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5412.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8a. (1) The state brownfield redevelopment fund is created as a revolving fund within the department of treasury to be administered as provided in this section. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the state brownfield redevelopment fund. Money in the state brownfield redevelopment fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the state brownfield redevelopment fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (2) The state treasurer shall credit to the fund money from the following sources: (a) All amounts deposited into the state brownfield redevelopment fund under subsection (4) and section 13b(14).13b(15). (b) The proceeds from repayment of a loan, including interest on those repayments, under subsection (3)(c)(vi). (c) Interest on funds deposited into the state brownfield redevelopment fund. (d) Money obtained from any other source authorized by law. (3) The Subject to subsections (5) and (6), the state brownfield redevelopment fund may be used only for the following purposes: (a) Up to 15% of the amounts deposited annually into the state brownfield redevelopment fund may be used to pay administrative costs of all of the following: (i) The Michigan strategic fund to implement this act. (ii) The department to implement this act. (iii) The department to implement part 196 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.19601 to 324.19616. (iv) The department of treasury to implement this act. (b) To make deposits into the clean Michigan initiative bond fund under section 19606(2)(d) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.19606, for use in providing grants and loans under section 19608(1)(a)(iv) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.19608. (c) To fund a grant and loan program created and operated by the Michigan strategic fund for the costs of eligible activities described in section 13b(4) on eligible properties. The grant and loan program must provide for all of the following: (i) The Michigan strategic fund shall create and operate a grant and loan program to provide grants and loans to fund eligible activities described in section 13b(4) on eligible property. The Michigan strategic fund shall develop and use a detailed application, approval, and compliance process adopted by resolution of the board of the Michigan strategic fund. This process must be published and available on the Michigan strategic fund website. Program standards, guidelines, templates, or any other forms to implement the grant and loan program must be approved by the board of the Michigan strategic fund. The Michigan strategic fund may delegate its approval authority under this subsection to a designee. (ii) A person may apply to the Michigan strategic fund for approval of a grant or loan to fund eligible activities described in section 13b(4) on eligible property. (iii) The Michigan strategic fund shall approve or deny an application not more than 60 days after receipt of an administratively complete application. If the application is neither approved nor denied within 60 days, it must be considered by the board of the Michigan strategic fund, or its designee if delegated, for action at, or by, the next regularly scheduled board meeting. The Michigan strategic fund may delegate the approval or denial of an application to the chairperson of the Michigan strategic fund or other designees determined by the board. (iv) If an application is approved under this subsection, the Michigan strategic fund shall enter into a written agreement with the applicant. The written agreement must provide all the conditions imposed on the applicant and the terms of the grant or loan. The written agreement must also provide for penalties if the applicant fails to comply with the provisions of the written agreement. (v) After the Michigan strategic fund and the applicant have entered into a written agreement under subparagraph (iv), the Michigan strategic fund shall distribute the proceeds to the applicant according to the terms of the written agreement. (vi) Any proceeds from repayment of a loan, including interest on those repayments, under this subsection must be paid into the state brownfield redevelopment fund or to the fund from which the loan was generated, as described in subdivision (b) and this subdivision. (d) To distribute construction period tax capture revenues, withholding tax capture revenues, income tax capture revenues, and sales and use tax capture revenues in accordance with a transformational brownfield plan under subsection (4). (e) To distribute revenue deposited in the state brownfield redevelopment fund from a brownfield plan that includes housing development activities and that was approved by the Michigan state housing development authority under section 13b(4)(b) to the housing development fund created in section 23 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1423. (4) The state treasurer shall deposit annually from the general fund into the state brownfield redevelopment fund an amount equal to the construction period tax capture revenues, withholding tax capture revenues, income tax capture revenues, and sales and use tax capture revenues due to be transmitted under all transformational brownfield plans. The department of treasury shall distribute the construction period tax capture revenues, withholding tax capture revenues, income tax capture revenues, and sales and use tax capture revenues to an authority, or to the owner or developer of the eligible property to which the revenues are attributable, in accordance with section 16(8) and the terms of the written development or reimbursement agreement for each transformational brownfield plan. Amounts transferred into the state brownfield redevelopment fund attributable to a specific transformational brownfield plan must be accounted for separately within the state brownfield redevelopment fund and must not be used for any other purpose or activity under this section or for any transformational brownfield plan other than the plan to which the revenues are attributable or for the additional administrative costs under this section associated with the implementation of a transformational brownfield plan. (5) All of the following apply regarding the distribution of money from the state brownfield redevelopment fund: (a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), money may not be disbursed from the state brownfield redevelopment fund if either of the following applies: (i) A report required under this act is delinquent. (ii) The Michigan strategic fund is delinquent in submitting a legislatively required report. (b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to money that is required to be disbursed under a written agreement that was entered into before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, unless the written agreement is amended or renewed on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection. (6) The Michigan strategic fund shall not disburse, or cause to be disbursed, money under the grant and loan program described in subsection (3)(c) or any other program under this act if the Michigan strategic fund is prohibited from disbursing, or causing to be disbursed, money for an economic incentive under section 7c of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2007c. (7) A written agreement under this act that is entered into, or amended or renewed, on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, must include a provision that money will not be disbursed under the written agreement if a report required under this act is delinquent or if the Michigan strategic fund is delinquent in submitting a legislatively required report. (8) As used in this section, "economic incentive" and "legislatively required report" mean those terms as defined in section 7c of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2007c. Sec. 16. (1) The municipal and county treasurers shall transmit tax increment revenues to the authority not more than 30 days after tax increment revenues are collected. (2) The authority shall expend the tax increment revenues received only in accordance with the brownfield plan. All surplus funds not deposited in the local brownfield revolving fund of the authority under section 8 must revert proportionately to the respective taxing bodies, except as provided in section 15(16). (3) The authority shall submit annually to the governing body, the department, the Michigan state housing development authority, and the Michigan strategic fund a financial report on the status of the activities of the authority for each calendar year. The report must include all of the following: (a) The total amount of local taxes that are approved for capture and the total amount of taxes levied for school operating purposes that are approved for capture for each parcel included in a brownfield plan. (b) The amount and purpose of expenditures of tax increment revenues. (c) The amount and source of tax increment revenues received for each active brownfield plan, including the amount of tax increment revenues captured in the most recent tax year and the cumulative amount of tax increment revenues captured for each brownfield plan. (d) The initial taxable value of all eligible property subject to the brownfield plan. (e) The captured taxable value realized by the authority for each eligible property subject to the brownfield plan. (f) The amount of actual capital investment made for each project. (g) The amount of tax increment revenues attributable to taxes levied for school operating purposes used for activities described in section 13b(6)(c), section 2(o)(i)(F) and (G), and section 2(o)(iii)(B) and (C). (h) The number of residential units constructed or rehabilitated for each project. (i) The amount, by square foot, of new or rehabilitated residential, retail, commercial, or industrial space for each project. (j) The number of new jobs created at the project. (k) A copy of all brownfield plan amendments approved by the local governmental unit. (l) All additional information that the governing body, the department, or the Michigan strategic fund considers necessary. (4) The department, the Michigan state housing development authority, and the Michigan strategic fund shall collect the financial reports submitted under subsection (3), compile a combined report that includes the use of local taxes, taxes levied for school operating purposes, and the state brownfield redevelopment fund, based on the information contained in those reports and any additional information considered necessary, and submit annually, not later than March 15 of each year, a report based on that information to each member of the legislature. (5) Beginning on January 1, 2013, all of the following reporting obligations apply: (a) The department shall on a quarterly basis post on its website the name, location, and amount of tax increment revenues, including taxes levied for school operating purposes, for each project approved by the department under this act during the immediately preceding quarter. (b) The Michigan strategic fund shall on a quarterly basis post on its website the name, location, and amount of tax increment revenues, including taxes levied for school operating purposes, for each project approved by the Michigan strategic fund under this act during the immediately preceding quarter. (c) The Michigan state housing development authority shall on a quarterly basis post on its website the name, location, and amount of tax increment revenues, including taxes levied for school operating purposes, for each project approved by the Michigan state housing development authority under this act during the immediately preceding quarter. (6) In addition to any other requirements under this act, not less than once every 3 years beginning not later than June 30, 2008, the auditor general shall conduct and report a performance postaudit on the effectiveness of the program established under this act. As part of the performance postaudit, the auditor general shall assess the extent to which the implementation of the program by the department, the Michigan state housing development authority, and the Michigan strategic fund facilitate and affect the redevelopment or reuse of eligible property and identify any factors that inhibit the program's effectiveness. The performance postaudit must also assess the extent to which the interpretation of statutory language, the development of guidance or administrative rules, and the implementation of the program by the department, the Michigan state housing development authority, and the Michigan strategic fund is consistent with the fundamental objective of facilitating and supporting timely and efficient brownfield redevelopment of eligible properties. (7) The owner or developer for an active project included within a brownfield plan must annually submit to the authority a report on the status of the project. The report must be in a form developed by the authority and must contain information necessary for the authority to report under subsection (3)(f), (h), (i), (j), and (k). The authority may waive the requirement to submit a report under this subsection. As used in this subsection, "active project" means a project for which the authority is currently capturing taxes under this act. (8) For a transformational brownfield plan, all of the following also apply: (a) The state treasurer shall transfer to the state brownfield redevelopment fund each fiscal year an amount equal to the construction period tax capture revenues, withholding tax capture revenues, income tax capture revenues, and sales and use tax capture revenues under all approved plans as provided for in section 8a(4). Funds Except as otherwise provided in section 8a(5) and (6), funds must be transmitted to the authority, or owner or developer of the eligible property to which the revenues are attributable, not later than 30 days after transfer to the state brownfield redevelopment fund. (b) The authority, the department, and the Michigan strategic fund shall follow the reporting requirements of subsections (3), (4), and (5) with respect to all approved transformational brownfield plans, and shall provide information on the amount and use of construction period tax capture revenues, withholding tax capture revenues, income tax capture revenues, and sales and use tax capture revenues to the same extent required for tax increment revenues. (c) The owner or developer of active projects included within a transformational brownfield plan shall provide the information required for the authority, the department, and the Michigan strategic fund to satisfy the reporting and audit requirements of this section. (9) If activities of the authority include housing development activities, the report under subsection (3) must also include all of the following: (a) The number of housing units produced. (b) The number of income qualified purchaser households served. (c) The number of income qualified renting households assisted. (d) For the initial reporting period, the prices at which the housing units were sold or rented. (e) Racial and socioeconomic data on the individuals purchasing or renting the housing units, or, if this data is not available, racial and socioeconomic data on the census tract in which the housing units are located. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04070'25) or House Bill No. 5417 (request no. H04070'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.